Missouri, session 2026, SB1772.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.158, 115.160, 208.009, 302.735,
537.675, 537.684, 595.010, 595.040, and 595.045, RSMo, are
repealed and ten new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 115.158, 115.160, 208.009, 302.733, 302.735,
537.675, 537.684, 595.010, 595.040, and 595.045, to read as
follows:
115.158. 1. The secretary of state shall implement a
centralized, interactive computerized statewide voter
registration list. This computerized list shall be known as
the "Missouri Voter Registration System". The system shall
be implemented by January 1, 2004, unless a waiver is
obtained pursuant to the Help America Vote Act of 2002. If
a waiver is obtained, the system shall be implemented by
January 1, 2006. The system shall be maintained and
administered by the secretary of state and contain the name
and registration information of every legally registered
voter in Missouri. In addition, the system shall:
(1) Assign a unique identifier to each legally
registered voter in Missouri;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1772 2
(2) Serve as the single system for storing and
managing the official list of registered voters throughout
Missouri;
(3) Be coordinated with other agency databases in
Missouri;
(4) Allow any election official in Missouri, including
local election authorities, immediate electronic access to
the information contained in the system;
(5) Allow all voter registration information obtained
by any local election official in Missouri to be
electronically entered into the system on an expedited basis
at the time the information is provided to the local
official. The secretary of state, as the chief state
election official, shall provide such support as may be
required so that local election officials are able to enter
the registration information; and
(6) Serve as the official voter registration list for
the conduct of all elections in Missouri.
2. The secretary of state and local election
authorities shall perform system maintenance on a regular
basis, which shall include:
(1) Removing names in accordance with the provisions
and procedures of the National Voter Registration Act of
1993 and coordinating system maintenance activities with
state agency records on death and felony status;
(2) Requiring the name of each registered voter to
appear in the system;
(3) Removing only voters who are not registered or who
are not eligible to vote; and
(4) Eliminating duplicate names from the system.

SB 1772 3
3. The secretary of state shall provide adequate
technological security measures to prevent the unauthorized
access to the system established pursuant to this section.
4. The secretary of state shall develop procedures to
ensure that voter registration records within the system are
accurate and updated regularly. At a minimum, the
procedures shall include:
(1) A system of file maintenance that makes a
reasonable effort to remove registrants who are ineligible
to vote. Consistent with the National Voter Registration
Act of 1993, registrants who have not responded to a notice
and who have not voted in two consecutive general elections
for federal office shall be removed from the official list
of eligible voters, except that no registrant may be removed
solely by reason of a failure to vote; and
(2) Safeguards to ensure that eligible voters are not
removed in error.
5. Voter registration information shall be verified in
accordance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, an application for voter registration may not be
accepted or processed unless the application includes:
(a) In the case of an applicant who has been issued a
current and valid driver's license, the applicant's driver's
license number; or
(b) In the case of any other applicant, other than an
applicant to whom subdivision (2) applies, the last four
digits of the applicant's Social Security number.
(2) If an applicant for voter registration has not
been issued a current and valid driver's license or a Social
Security number, the applicant shall be assigned a number
which will serve to identify the applicant for voter

SB 1772 4
registration purposes. The number assigned under this
subdivision shall be used as the unique identifying number
within the system.
(3) The secretary of state and the director of the
department of revenue shall enter into an agreement to match
information in the database of the voter registration system
with information in the database of the motor vehicle
system, which shall include information pertaining to the
citizenship status of those within the department of
revenue's database, to enable the secretary to verify the
accuracy of information provided on applications for voter
registration.
(4) The director of the department of revenue shall
enter into an agreement with the commissioner of Social
Security and comply with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.
6. In addition to using the system for voter
registration, the election authorities and secretary of
state may use the system for the collection and
dissemination of election results and other pertinent
information. Any information contained in any state or
local voter registration system, limited to the master voter
registration list or any other list generated from the
information, subject to chapter 610, shall not be used for
commercial purposes; provided, however, that the information
100 may be used for elections, for candidates, or for ballot
101 measures, furnished at a reasonable fee. Violation of this
102 section shall be a class B misdemeanor. For purposes of
103 this section, "commercial purposes" means the use of a
104 public record for the purpose of sale or resale or for the
105 purpose of producing a document containing all or part of
106 the copy, printout, or photograph for sale or the obtaining
107 of names and addresses from public records for the purpose

SB 1772 5
108 of solicitation or the sale of names and addresses to
109 another for the purpose of solicitation or for any purpose
110 in which the purchaser can reasonably anticipate the receipt
111 of monetary gain from the direct or indirect use of the
112 public record.
113 7. The secretary of state shall establish an advisory
114 committee to assist in the establishment and maintenance of
115 the Missouri voter registration system.
116 8. The secretary of state may promulgate rules to
117 execute this section. No rule or portion of a rule
118 promulgated pursuant to the authority of this section shall
119 become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to
120 chapter 536.
121 9. Election authorities and any agency required under
122 the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 to accept voter
123 registration applications shall forward registration and
124 other data in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state
125 to assist with administering and maintaining the Missouri
126 voter registration system in accordance with the Help
127 America Vote Act of 2002.
115.160. 1. All Missouri driver's license applicants
shall receive a voter registration application form as a
simultaneous part of the application for a driver's license,
renewal of driver's license, change of address, duplicate
request and a nondriver's license.
2. If a single application form is used, the voter
registration application portion of any application
described in subsection 1 of this section may not require
any information that duplicates information required in the
driver's license portion of the form, except a second
signature or other information required by law.

SB 1772 6
3. After conferring with the secretary of state as the
chief state election official responsible for overseeing of
the voter registration process, the director of revenue
shall adopt rules and regulations pertaining to the format
of the voter registration application used by the
department. The director of revenue shall utilize
electronic voter registration application forms and provide
for secure electronic transfer of voter registration
information to election authorities. The secretary of state
and the director of revenue shall ensure the confidentiality
and integrity of the voter registration data collected,
maintained, received, or transmitted under this section.
4. No information relating to the failure of an
applicant for a driver's license or nondriver's license to
sign a voter registration application may be used for any
purpose other than voter registration.
5. Any voter registration application received
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be
forwarded, in a secure and electronic manner, to the
election authority located within that county or any city
not within a county, or if there is more than one election
authority within the county, then to the election authority
located nearest to the location where the driver's license
application was received. Voter registration information,
including an electronic image of the signature of the
applicant, shall be transmitted in a format compatible with
the Missouri voter registration system established in
section 115.158 which allows for review by the election
authority and does not require the election authority to
manually reenter the information, provided that the election
authority shall print out a paper copy of the information
and retain such information in the manner required by

SB 1772 7
section 115.145. The election authority receiving the
application forms shall review the applications and forward,
in a secure and electronic manner, any applications
pertaining to a different election authority to that
election authority.
6. A completed voter registration application accepted
in the driver's licensing process shall be transmitted to
the election authority described in subsection 5 of this
section not later than three business days after the form is
completed by the applicant.
7. Any person registering to vote when applying for or
renewing a Missouri driver's license shall submit with the
application form a copy of a birth certificate, a Native
American tribal document, or other proof of United States
citizenship, a valid Missouri driver's license, or other
form of personal identification. Any person who, at the
time of a transaction with the division of motor vehicle and
driver licensing of the department of revenue, provides a
document that establishes noncitizenship shall not be
offered the opportunity to register to vote as part of the
transaction. The division of motor vehicle and driver
licensing shall determine whether an applicant for a
driver's license has the requisite proof of citizenship
needed to register to vote. The division shall only provide
an opportunity to register to vote to a customer who
provides documentation demonstrating that the individual is
a citizen of the United States.
208.009. 1. No individual who is not a United States
citizen or national of the United States shall be eligible
to receive food assistance through the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), unless that individual
meets the definition of an eligible alien pursuant to 7

SB 1772 8
U.S.C. 2015(f) and meets the definition of a qualified alien
pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1641(b).
2. No individual who is not a United States citizen or
national of the United States shall be eligible to receive
medical assistance through MO HealthNet, unless that
individual meets the definition of an eligible alien
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396b(v) and meets the definition of a
qualified alien pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1641(b).
3. No alien unlawfully present in the United States
shall receive any state or local public benefit, except for
state or local public benefits that may be offered under 8
U.S.C. 1621(b). Nothing in this section shall be construed
to prohibit the rendering of emergency medical care,
prenatal care, services offering alternatives to abortion,
emergency assistance, or legal assistance to any person.
[2.] 4. As used in this section, "public benefit"
means any grant, contract, or loan provided by an agency of
state or local government; or any retirement, welfare,
health, disability, housing, or food assistance benefit
under which payments, assistance, credits, or reduced rates
or fees are provided. The term "public benefit" shall not
include postsecondary education public benefits as defined
in section 173.1110, any municipal permit, or contracts or
agreements between public utility providers and their
customers or unemployment benefits payable under chapter
288. The unemployment compensation program shall verify the
lawful presence of an alien for the purpose of determining
eligibility for benefits in accordance with its own
procedures.
[3.] 5. In addition to providing proof of other
eligibility requirements, at the time of application for any
state or local public benefit, an applicant [who is eighteen

SB 1772 9
years of age or older] shall provide affirmative proof [that
the applicant is] they are a United States citizen [or a
permanent resident of the United States or is lawfully
present in the United States], a United States national, or
an alien with eligible immigration status for public
benefits. Such affirmative proof shall include documentary
evidence recognized by the department of revenue when
processing an application for a driver's license, a Missouri
driver's license, as well as any document issued by the
federal government that confirms an alien's lawful presence
in the United States[. In processing applications for
public benefits, an employee of an agency of state or local
government shall not inquire about the legal status of a
custodial parent or guardian applying for a public benefit
on behalf of his or her dependent child who is a citizen or
permanent resident of the United States] and eligible alien
status for public benefits.
[4.] 6. An applicant who cannot provide the proof
required under this section at the time of application may
alternatively sign an affidavit under oath, attesting to
either United States citizenship or classification by the
United States as an alien lawfully admitted [for permanent
residence] that is eligible for public benefits, in order to
receive temporary benefits or a temporary identification
document as provided in this section. The affidavit shall
be on or consistent with forms prepared by the state or
local government agency administering the state or local
public benefits and shall include the applicant's Social
Security number or any applicable federal identification
number and an explanation of the penalties under state law
for obtaining public assistance benefits fraudulently.

SB 1772 10
[5.] 7. (1) An applicant who has provided the sworn
affidavit required under subsection [4] 6 of this section is
eligible to receive temporary public benefits as follows:
[(1)] (a) For the minimum period required under
federal law, or if no minimum period is established under
federal law, for ninety days or until such time that it is
determined that the applicant is not lawfully present in the
United States or otherwise ineligible for public benefits
due to immigration status, whichever is earlier; or
[(2)] (b) Indefinitely if the applicant provides a
copy of a completed application for a birth certificate that
is pending in Missouri or some other state. An extension
granted under this subsection shall terminate upon the
applicant's receipt of a birth certificate or a
determination that a birth certificate does not exist
because the applicant is not a United States citizen.
(2) Failure to submit acceptable documentation
establishing United States citizenship, United States
national status, or alien status eligible for such public
benefits within the temporary eligibility period shall
result in denial or termination of public benefits.
(3) No additional period of eligibility for temporary
benefits shall be granted to any applicant who has
previously been denied public benefits at any time due to a
failure to verify United States citizenship, United States
national status, or alien status eligible for such public
benefits.
[6.] 8. An applicant who is an alien shall not receive
any state or local public benefit unless the alien's lawful
presence in the United States is first verified by the
federal government. State and local agencies administering
100 public benefits in this state shall cooperate with the

SB 1772 11
101 United States Department of Homeland Security in achieving
102 verification of an alien's lawful presence in the United
103 States in furtherance of this section. The system utilized
104 [may] shall include, but not be limited to, the Systematic
105 Alien Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the
106 United States Department of Homeland Security. [After an
107 applicant's lawful presence in the United States has been
108 verified through the Systematic Alien Verification for
109 Entitlements Program, no additional verification is required
110 within the same agency of the state or local government.]
111 9. A match through any electronic or data verification
112 system shall not, by itself, be accepted as proof of
113 identity. Every applicant for public benefits shall be
114 required to provide documentary proof of United States
115 citizenship, United States national status, or alien status
116 eligible for such public benefits pursuant to subsection 5
117 of this section.
118 [7.] 10. The provisions of this section shall not be
119 construed to require any nonprofit organization duly
120 registered with the Internal Revenue Service to enforce the
121 provisions of this section, nor does it prohibit such an
122 organization from providing aid.
123 [8.] 11. Any agency that administers public benefits
124 shall provide assistance in obtaining appropriate
125 documentation to persons applying for public benefits who
126 sign the affidavit required by subsection [4] 6 of this
127 section stating they are eligible for such benefits but lack
128 the documents required under subsection [3] 5 of this
129 section.
130 12. The MO HealthNet division shall require a field
131 for citizenship or immigration status on all presumptive
132 eligibility applications. The division shall require

SB 1772 12
133 hospitals, clinics, and other qualified entities authorized
134 to conduct presumptive eligibility determinations to collect
135 and transmit attestations of citizenship or eligible
136 immigration status to the division. No presumptive
137 eligibility application shall be approved unless the
138 applicant certifies that they are a United States citizen,
139 United States national, or alien with eligible immigration
140 status for MO HealthNet.
141 13. Any agency that administers public benefits shall
142 verify that the applicant or enrollee of that public benefit
143 is a United States citizen, United States national, or an
144 eligible alien for such public benefit through the
145 Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program
146 operated by the United States Department of Homeland
147 Security and any other verification system at the time of
148 application, at each eligibility redetermination, and
149 whenever information is received indicating a change in
150 circumstances affecting eligibility related to citizenship
151 or immigration status.
152 (1) If verification confirms that an applicant or
153 enrollee is not lawfully present in the United States or no
154 longer qualifies pursuant to subsections 1, 2, or 3 of this
155 section, or any successor provision of state and federal
156 law, the agency that administers that public benefit shall
157 immediately terminate future benefits and initiate
158 disenrollment, except as otherwise permitted for temporary
159 benefits under subsection 6 of this section.
160 (2) If any agency that administers public benefits is
161 unable to determine an applicant's or enrollee's lawful
162 presence after a Systematic Alien Verification for
163 Entitlements Program query or other authorized verification,
164 the agency shall immediately suspend approval or

SB 1772 13
165 continuation of benefits and refer the case to the United
166 States Department of Homeland Security or other appropriate
167 federal agency for investigation and enforcement action. No
168 public benefits shall be paid or continued unless and until
169 lawful presence is conclusively verified, except as
170 otherwise permitted for temporary benefits under subsection
171 6 of this section.
172 (3) The appropriate agency for referral for an
173 applicant or enrollee for whom they were unable to verify
174 lawful presence shall include, but not be limited to, the
175 United States Department of Agriculture.
176 14. When administering SNAP benefits, the department
177 of social services shall:
178 (1) Consider the entire income and financial resources
179 of any individual rendered ineligible to receive SNAP
180 benefits under subsection 1 of this section when determining
181 the eligibility and benefit allotment of the household of
182 which such individual is a member; and
183 (2) Notwithstanding any options provided under 7 CFR
184 Section 273.11(c)(3), not prorate or exclude the income or
185 financial resources of ineligible individuals under
186 subsection 1 of this section. All such income and resources
187 shall be fully considered.
302.733. 1. An operator of a commercial motor vehicle
shall be able to read and speak the English language
sufficiently to:
(1) Converse with the general public;
(2) Understand highway traffic signs and signals in
the English language;
(3) Respond to official inquiries; and
(4) Make entries on reports and records.

SB 1772 14
2. A person commits the offense of operating a
commercial motor vehicle without sufficient English language
proficiency if he or she:
(1) Operates a commercial vehicle; and
(2) Fails to demonstrate proficiency in the English
language as required under subsection 1 of this section.
3. The offense of operating a commercial motor vehicle
without sufficient English language proficiency is a class D
misdemeanor for a first offense and a class B misdemeanor
for a second or subsequent offense.
4. A driver found to be in violation of the language
proficiency requirements of this section shall be prohibited
from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this state
until such a time that the driver is able to meet the
requirements of subsection 1 of this section.
5. Any operator of a commercial motor vehicle found to
be in violation of this section shall, in addition to the
penalties provided under subsections 3 and 4 of this
section, be subject to a fine of one thousand dollars.
6. A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found to
be in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine
of three thousand dollars for each violation.
7. A commercial motor carrier shall be notified of the
location of any commercial motor vehicle involved in a
violation of this section and, upon payment of a fine in
full and presentation of a driver who meets all of the
requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle in this
state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If the
commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such fine
or present such driver within twelve hours after
notification, the owner of any cargo being transported by
the commercial motor vehicle shall be notified and allowed

SB 1772 15
to arrange for the transfer of the cargo to another
vehicle. Neither the state or the owner of such cargo shall
be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such cargo.
302.735. 1. An application shall not be taken from a
nonresident after September 30, 2005. The application for a
commercial driver's license shall include, but not be
limited to, the applicant's legal name, mailing and
residence address, if different, a physical description of
the person, including sex, height, weight and eye color, the
person's Social Security number, date of birth and any other
information deemed appropriate by the director. The
application shall also require, beginning September 30,
2005, the applicant to provide the names of all states where
the applicant has been previously licensed to drive any type
of motor vehicle during the preceding ten years.
2. A commercial driver's license shall expire on the
applicant's birthday in the sixth year after issuance,
unless the license must be issued for a shorter period due
to other requirements of law or for transition or staggering
of work as determined by the director, and must be renewed
on or before the date of expiration. When a person changes
such person's name an application for a duplicate license
shall be made to the director of revenue. When a person
changes such person's mailing address or residence the
applicant shall notify the director of revenue of said
change, however, no application for a duplicate license is
required. A commercial license issued pursuant to this
section to an applicant less than twenty-one years of age
and seventy years of age and older shall expire on the
applicant's birthday in the third year after issuance,
unless the license must be issued for a shorter period as
determined by the director.

SB 1772 16
3. A commercial driver's license containing a
hazardous materials endorsement issued to an applicant who
is between the age of twenty-one and sixty-nine shall not be
issued for a period exceeding five years from the approval
date of the security threat assessment as determined by the
Transportation Security Administration.
4. The director shall issue a biennial commercial
driver's license containing a school bus endorsement to an
applicant who is seventy-five years of age or older. The
fee for such license shall be seven dollars and fifty cents.
5. A commercial driver's license containing a
hazardous materials endorsement issued to an applicant who
is seventy years of age or older shall not be issued for a
period exceeding three years. The director shall not
require such drivers to obtain a security threat assessment
more frequently than such assessment is required by the
Transportation Security Administration under the Uniting and
Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools
Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act (USA
PATRIOT ACT) of 2001.
(1) The state shall immediately revoke a hazardous
materials endorsement upon receipt of an initial
determination of threat assessment and immediate revocation
from the Transportation Security Administration as defined
by 49 CFR 1572.13(a).
(2) The state shall revoke or deny a hazardous
materials endorsement within fifteen days of receipt of a
final determination of threat assessment from the
Transportation Security Administration as required by CFR
1572.13(a).

SB 1772 17
6. The fee for a commercial driver's license or
renewal commercial driver's license issued for a period
greater than three years shall be forty dollars.
7. The fee for a commercial driver's license or
renewal commercial driver's license issued for a period of
three years or less shall be twenty dollars.
8. The fee for a duplicate commercial driver's license
shall be twenty dollars.
9. In order for the director to properly transition
driver's license requirements under the Motor Carrier Safety
Improvement Act of 1999 and the Uniting and Strengthening
America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept
and Obstruct Terrorism Act (USA PATRIOT ACT) of 2001, the
director is authorized to stagger expiration dates and make
adjustments for any fees, including driver examination fees
that are incurred by the driver as a result of the initial
issuance of a transitional license required to comply with
such acts.
10. Within thirty days after moving to this state, the
holder of a commercial driver's license shall apply for a
commercial driver's license in this state. The applicant
shall meet all other requirements of sections 302.700 to
302.780, except that the director may waive the driving test
for a commercial driver's license as required in section
302.720 if the applicant for a commercial driver's license
has a valid commercial driver's license from a state which
has requirements for issuance of such license comparable to
those in this state.
11. Any person who falsifies any information in an
application or test for a commercial driver's license shall
not be licensed to operate a commercial motor vehicle, or
the person's commercial driver's license shall be cancelled,

SB 1772 18
for a period of one year after the director discovers such
falsification.
12. Beginning July 1, 2005, the director shall not
issue a commercial driver's license under this section
unless the director verifies that the applicant is lawfully
present in the United States before accepting the
application. If lawful presence is granted for a temporary
period, no commercial driver's license shall be issued. The
100 director may, by rule or regulation, establish procedures to
101 verify the lawful presence of the applicant and establish
102 the duration of any commercial driver's license issued under
103 this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated
104 pursuant to the authority of this section shall become
105 effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter
106 536.
107 13. (1) Effective December 19, 2005, notwithstanding
108 any provisions of subsections 1 and 5 of this section to the
109 contrary, the director may issue a nondomiciled commercial
110 driver's license or commercial driver's instruction permit
111 to a resident of a foreign jurisdiction if the United States
112 Secretary of Transportation has determined that the
113 commercial motor vehicle testing and licensing standards in
114 the foreign jurisdiction do not meet the testing standards
115 established in 49 CFR 383.
116 (2) Any applicant for a nondomiciled commercial
117 driver's license or commercial driver's instruction permit
118 must present evidence satisfactory to the director that the
119 applicant currently has employment with an employer in this
120 state. The nondomiciled applicant must meet the same
121 testing, driver record requirements, conditions, and is
122 subject to the same disqualification and conviction

SB 1772 19
123 reporting requirements applicable to resident commercial
124 drivers.
125 (3) The nondomiciled commercial driver's license will
126 expire on the same date that the documents establishing
127 lawful presence for employment expire. The word
128 "nondomiciled" shall appear on the face of the nondomiciled
129 commercial driver's license. Any applicant for a Missouri
130 nondomiciled commercial driver's license or commercial
131 driver's instruction permit must first surrender any
132 nondomiciled commercial driver's license issued by another
133 state.
134 (4) The nondomiciled commercial driver's license
135 applicant must pay the same fees as required for the
136 issuance of a resident commercial driver's license or
137 commercial driver's instruction permit.
138 (5) A person holding a nondomiciled commercial
139 driver's license or commercial driver's instruction permit
140 within this state shall also possess a valid work visa and
141 provide proof of citizenship to validate his or her identity
142 while operating a commercial motor vehicle. Proof of
143 citizenship shall be demonstrated through presentation of a
144 birth certificate, naturalization certificate, or valid
145 passport.
146 (6) A commercial motor carrier whose driver is found
147 to be in violation of subdivision (5) of this subsection
148 shall be subject to a fine in the amount of three thousand
149 dollars for each violation.
150 (7) A driver found to be in violation of subdivision
151 (5) of this subsection shall be prohibited from operating a
152 commercial motor vehicle within this state until such a time
153 that the driver is able to meet the requirements of such
154 subdivision. Any driver found to be operating a motor

SB 1772 20
155 vehicle within this state while under such prohibition shall
156 be guilty of a class B misdemeanor and upon conviction shall
157 be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars or
158 by imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or by both
159 such fine and imprisonment.
160 (8) The commercial motor carrier shall be notified of
161 the location of any commercial motor vehicle involved in a
162 violation of subdivision (5) of this subsection and, upon
163 payment of the fine in full and presentation of a driver who
164 meets all requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle
165 within this state, shall take possession of the vehicle. If
166 the commercial motor carrier is unable to either pay such
167 fine or present such driver within twelve hours after
168 notification, the owner of any cargo being transported by
169 the commercial motor vehicle shall be notified and allowed
170 to arrange for the transfer of the cargo to another
171 vehicle. Neither the state or the owner of such cargo shall
172 be liable for any reasonable action to transfer such cargo.
173 14. Foreign jurisdiction for purposes of issuing a
174 nondomiciled commercial driver's license or commercial
175 driver's instruction permit under this section shall not
176 include any of the fifty states of the United States or
177 Canada or Mexico.
537.675. 1. As used in sections 537.675 through
537.693, the following terms mean:
(1) "Annual claims", that period of time commencing on
the first day of January of every year after December 31,
2002, and ending on the last day of that calendar year;
(2) "Commission", the labor and industrial relations
commission;
(3) "Division", the division of workers' compensation;

SB 1772 21
(4) "Punitive damage final judgment", an award for
punitive damages excluding interest that is no longer
subject to review by courts of this state or of the United
States;
(5) "Uncompensated tort victim", a person who:
(a) Is a party in a personal injury or wrongful death
lawsuit; or is a tort victim whose claim against the tort-
feasor has been settled for the policy limits of insurance
covering the liability of such tort-feasor and such policy
limits are inadequate in light of the nature and extent of
damages due to the personal injury or wrongful death;
(b) Unless described in paragraph (a) of this
subdivision:
a. Has obtained a final monetary judgment in that
lawsuit described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision
against a tort-feasor for personal injuries, or wrongful
death in a case in which all appeals are final;
b. Has exercised due diligence in enforcing the
judgment; and
c. Has not collected the full amount of the judgment;
(c) Is not a corporation, company, partnership or
other incorporated or unincorporated commercial entity;
(d) Is not any entity claiming a right of subrogation;
(e) Was not on house arrest and was not confined in
any federal, state, regional, county or municipal jail,
prison or other correctional facility at the time he or she
sustained injury from the tort-feasor;
(f) Has not pleaded guilty to or been found guilty of
two or more felonies, where such two or more felonies
occurred within ten years of the occurrence of the tort in
question, and where either of such felonies involved a
controlled substance or an act of violence; [and]

SB 1772 22
(g) Is a resident of the state of Missouri or
sustained personal injury or death by a tort which occurred
in the state of Missouri; and
(h) Is a citizen of the United States, or is a lawful
permanent resident, or lawfully holds a valid visa issued by
the United States Department of State at the time of the
claim for dispensation.
2. There is created the "Tort Victims' Compensation
Fund". Unexpended moneys in the fund shall not lapse at the
end of the biennium as provided in section 33.080.
3. Any party receiving a judgment final for purposes
of appeal for punitive damages in any case filed in any
division of any circuit court of the state of Missouri shall
notify the attorney general of the state of Missouri of such
award, except for actions claiming improper health care
pursuant to chapter 538. The state of Missouri shall have a
lien for deposit into the tort victims' compensation fund to
the extent of fifty percent of the punitive damage final
judgment which shall attach in any such case after deducting
attorney's fees and expenses. In each case, the attorney
general shall serve a lien notice by certified mail or
registered mail upon the party or parties against whom the
state has a claim for collection of its share of a punitive
damage final judgment. On a petition filed by the state,
the court, on written notice to all interested parties,
shall adjudicate the rights of the parties and enforce the
lien. The lien shall not be satisfied out of any recovery
until the attorney's claim for fees and expenses is paid.
The state can file its lien in all cases where punitive
damages are awarded upon the entry of the judgment final for
purposes of appeal. The state cannot enforce its lien until
there is a punitive damage final judgment. Cases resolved

SB 1772 23
by arbitration, mediation or compromise settlement prior to
a punitive damage final judgment are exempt from the
provisions of this section. Nothing in this section shall
hinder or in any way affect the right or ability of the
parties to any claim or lawsuit to compromise or settle such
claim or litigation on any terms and at any time the parties
desire.
4. The state of Missouri shall have no interest in or
right to intervene at any stage of any judicial proceeding
pursuant to this section, except to enforce its lien rights
as provided in subsection 3 of this section.
5. Twenty-six percent of all payments deposited into
the tort victims' compensation fund and all interest
accruing on the principal regardless of source or
designation shall be transferred to the basic civil legal
services fund established in section 477.650. Moneys in the
tort victims' compensation fund shall not be used to pay any
portion of a refund mandated by Article X, Section 18 of the
Constitution.
6. The department of labor and industrial relations
shall verify compliance with the eligibility requirements of
any claimant under this section prior to authorizing payment
from the tort victims' compensation fund, and shall deny any
claim that fails to meet such requirements.
537.684. 1. A claim for compensation may be filed by
a person eligible for compensation or, if the person is an
incapacitated or disabled person, or a minor, by the
person's spouse, parent, conservator or guardian.
2. A claim shall be filed not later than two years
after the judgment upon which it is based becomes final and
all appeals are final. If there is no judgment, claims must
be filed within time limits prescribed pursuant to section

SB 1772 24
516.120, except for cases resulting in death, in which case
claims must be filed within time limits prescribed pursuant
to section 537.100.
3. Each claim shall be filed in person or by mail.
The division shall investigate such claim prior to the
opening of formal proceedings. The director of the division
shall assign an administrative law judge, associate
administrative law judge or legal advisor within the
division to hear any claim for compensation filed. The
claimant shall be notified of the date and time of any
hearing on the claim. In determining the amount of
compensation for which a claimant is eligible, the division
shall:
(1) Consider the facts stated on the application filed
pursuant to section 537.678;
(2) Obtain a copy of the final judgment, if any, from
the appropriate court;
(3) Determine the amount of the loss to the claimant,
or the victim's survivors or dependents; and
(4) If there is no final judgment, determine the
degree or extent to which the victim's acts or conduct
provoked, incited or contributed to the injuries or death of
the victim.
4. The claimant may present evidence and testimony on
his or her own behalf or may retain counsel. The
administrative law judge may, as part of any award entered
under sections 537.675 to 537.693, determine and allow
reasonable attorney's fees, which shall not exceed fifteen
percent of the amount awarded as compensation under sections
537.675 to 537.693, which fee shall be paid out of, but not
in addition to, the amount of compensation, to the attorney
representing the claimant. No attorney for a claimant shall

SB 1772 25
ask for, contract for, or receive any larger sum than the
amount so allowed.
5. Prior to any hearing, the person filing a claim
shall submit reports, if available, from all hospitals,
physicians or surgeons who treated or examined the victim
for the injury for which compensation is sought. If, in the
opinion of the division, an examination of the injured
victim or a report on the cause of death of the victim would
be of material aid, the division may appoint a duly
qualified, impartial physician to make an examination and
report. A finding of the judge or jury in the underlying
case shall be considered as evidence.
6. Each and every payment shall be exempt from
attachment, garnishment or any other remedy available to
creditors for the collection of a debt, provided however,
this section shall not in any way affect the right of any
attorney who represents or represented any claimant to
collect any fee or expenses to which he or she is entitled,
provided that attorney's fees awarded from the filing and
adjudication of the claim are determined to be just and
reasonable by the hearing officer and are not to exceed
fifteen percent of the applicant's payment from the tort
victims' compensation fund.
7. Payments of compensation shall not be made directly
to any person legally incompetent to receive them but shall
be made to the parent, guardian or conservator for the
benefit of such minor, disabled or incapacitated person.
8. For payment of all claims from the fund, the
division shall determine the aggregate amount of all awards
made on those claims filed during an annual claims period.
Such determination shall be made on or before the thirtieth
day of June in the next succeeding year. If the aggregate

SB 1772 26
value of the awards does not exceed the total amount of
money in the fund, then the awards shall be paid in full on
or before the thirtieth day of September in the next
succeeding year. If the aggregate value of the awards does
exceed the total amount of money in the fund, then the
awards shall be paid on a pro rata basis on or before the
thirtieth day of September in the next succeeding year.
9. If there are no funds available, then no claim
shall be paid until funds have accumulated in the tort
victims' compensation fund and have been appropriated to the
division for payment to uncompensated tort victims. When
sufficient funds become available for payment of claims of
uncompensated tort victims, awards that have been determined
but have not been paid shall be paid in chronological order
with the oldest paid first, based upon the date on which the
application was filed with the division. Any award pursuant
to this subsection that cannot be paid due to a lack of
funds appropriated for payment of claims of uncompensated
tort victims shall not constitute a claim against the state.
10. In the event there are no funds available for
payment of claims, then the division may suspend all action
related to valuing claims and granting awards until such
time as funds in excess of one hundred thousand dollars have
accumulated in the tort victims' compensation fund, at which
time the division shall resume its claim processing duties.
595.010. 1. As used in sections 595.010 to 595.075,
unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Child", a dependent, unmarried person who is
under eighteen years of age and includes a posthumous child,
stepchild, or an adopted child;

SB 1772 27
(2) "Claimant", a victim or a dependent, relative,
survivor, or member of the family, of a victim eligible for
compensation pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075;
(3) "Conservator", a person or corporation appointed
by a court to have the care and custody of the estate of a
minor or a disabled person, including a limited conservator;
(4) "Counseling", problem-solving and support
concerning emotional issues that result from criminal
victimization licensed pursuant to section 595.030.
Counseling is a confidential service provided either on an
individual basis or in a group. Counseling has as a primary
purpose to enhance, protect and restore a person's sense of
well-being and social functioning after victimization.
Counseling does not include victim advocacy services such as
crisis telephone counseling, attendance at medical
procedures, law enforcement interviews or criminal justice
proceedings;
(5) "Crime", an act committed in this state which,
regardless of whether it is adjudicated, involves the
application of force or violence or the threat of force or
violence by the offender upon the victim but shall include
the crime of driving while intoxicated, vehicular
manslaughter and hit and run; and provided, further, that no
act involving the operation of a motor vehicle except
driving while intoxicated, vehicular manslaughter and hit
and run which results in injury to another shall constitute
a crime for the purpose of sections 595.010 to 595.075,
unless such injury was intentionally inflicted through the
use of a motor vehicle. A crime shall also include an act
of terrorism, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Section 2331, which
has been committed outside of the United States against a
resident of Missouri;

SB 1772 28
(6) "Crisis intervention counseling", helping to
reduce psychological trauma where victimization occurs;
(7) "Department", the department of public safety;
(8) "Dependent", mother, father, spouse, spouse's
mother, spouse's father, child, grandchild, adopted child,
illegitimate child, niece or nephew, who is wholly or
partially dependent for support upon, and living with, but
shall include children entitled to child support but not
living with, the victim at the time of his injury or death
due to a crime alleged in a claim pursuant to sections
595.010 to 595.075;
(9) "Direct service", providing physical services to a
victim of crime including, but not limited to,
transportation, funeral arrangements, child care, emergency
food, clothing, shelter, notification and information;
(10) "Director", the director of public safety of this
state or a person designated by him for the purposes of
sections 595.010 to 595.075;
(11) "Disabled person", one who is unable by reason of
any physical or mental condition to receive and evaluate
information or to communicate decisions to such an extent
that the person lacks ability to manage his financial
resources, including a partially disabled person who lacks
the ability, in part, to manage his financial resources;
(12) ["Emergency service", those services provided to
alleviate the immediate effects of the criminal act or
offense, and may include cash grants of not more than one
hundred dollars;
(13)] "Earnings", net income or net wages;
(13) "Eligible injured victim", a person who, at the
time of application for compensation from the crime victims'
compensation fund, is:

SB 1772 29
(a) A citizen of the United States, a lawful permanent
resident, or a person lawfully present in the United States
under a valid visa issued by the United States Department of
State; and
(b) Killed or suffers personal physical injury in this
state as a result of:
a. The commission or attempted commission of any crime
by another person;
b. A good-faith attempt to assist a person against
whom a crime is being committed or attempted; or
c. Assisting a law enforcement officer in the
apprehension of a person the officer has reason to believe
has committed or attempted to commit a crime;
(14) "Emergency service", those services provided to
alleviate the immediate effects of the criminal act or
offense, and may include cash grants of not more than one
hundred dollars;
[(14)] (15) "Family", the spouse, parent, grandparent,
stepmother, stepfather, child, grandchild, brother, sister,
half brother, half sister, adopted children of parent, or
spouse's parents;
[(15)] (16) "Funeral expenses", the expenses of the
funeral, burial, cremation or other chosen method of
interment, including plot or tomb and other necessary
incidents to the disposition of the remains;
[(16)] (17) "Gainful employment", engaging on a
regular and continuous basis, up to the date of the incident
upon which the claim is based, in a lawful activity from
which a person derives a livelihood;
100 [(17)] (18) "Guardian", one appointed by a court to
101 have the care and custody of the person of a minor or of an
102 incapacitated person, including a limited guardian;

SB 1772 30
103 [(18)] (19) "Hit and run", the crime of leaving the
104 scene of a motor vehicle accident as defined in section
105 577.060;
106 [(19)] (20) "Incapacitated person", one who is unable
107 by reason of any physical or mental condition to receive and
108 evaluate information or to communicate decisions to such an
109 extent that he lacks capacity to meet essential requirements
110 for food, clothing, shelter, safety or other care such that
111 serious physical injury, illness, or disease is likely to
112 occur, including a partially incapacitated person who lacks
113 the capacity to meet, in part, such essential requirements;
114 [(20)] (21) "Injured victim", a person:
115 (a) Killed or receiving a personal physical injury in
116 this state as a result of another person's commission of or
117 attempt to commit any crime;
118 (b) Killed or receiving a personal physical injury in
119 this state while in a good faith attempt to assist a person
120 against whom a crime is being perpetrated or attempted;
121 (c) Killed or receiving a personal physical injury in
122 this state while assisting a law enforcement officer in the
123 apprehension of a person who the officer has reason to
124 believe has perpetrated or attempted a crime;
125 [(21)] (22) "Law enforcement official", a sheriff and
126 his regular deputies, municipal police officer or member of
127 the Missouri state highway patrol and such other persons as
128 may be designated by law as peace officers;
129 [(22)] (23) "Offender", a person who commits a crime;
130 [(23)] (24) "Personal injury", physical, emotional, or
131 mental harm or trauma resulting from the crime upon which
132 the claim is based;

SB 1772 31
133 [(24)] (25) "Private agency", a not-for-profit
134 corporation, in good standing in this state, which provides
135 services to victims of crime and their dependents;
136 [(25)] (26) "Public agency", a part of any local or
137 state government organization which provides services to
138 victims of crime;
139 [(26)] (27) "Relative", the spouse of the victim or a
140 person related to the victim within the third degree of
141 consanguinity or affinity as calculated according to civil
142 law;
143 [(27)] (28) "Survivor", the spouse, parent, legal
144 guardian, grandparent, sibling or child of the deceased
145 victim of the victim's household at the time of the crime;
146 [(28)] (29) "Victim", a person who suffers personal
147 injury or death as a direct result of a crime, as defined in
148 subdivision (5) of this subsection;
149 [(29)] (30) "Victim advocacy", assisting the victim of
150 a crime and his dependents to acquire services from existing
151 community resources.
152 2. As used in sections 595.010 to 595.075, the term
153 "alcohol-related traffic offense" means those offenses
154 defined by sections 577.001, 577.010, and 577.012, and any
155 county or municipal ordinance which prohibits operation of a
156 motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol.
595.040. 1. Acceptance of any compensation under
sections 595.010 to 595.075 shall subrogate this state, to
the extent of such compensation paid, to any right or right
of action accruing to the claimant or to the victim to
recover payments on account of losses resulting from the
crime with respect to which the compensation has been paid.
The attorney general may enforce the subrogation, and he
shall bring suit to recover from any person to whom

SB 1772 32
compensation is paid, to the extent of the compensation
actually paid under sections 595.010 to 595.075, any amount
received by the claimant from any source exceeding the
actual loss to the victim.
2. The department shall have a lien on any
compensation received by the claimant, in addition to
compensation received under provisions of sections 595.010
to 595.075, for injuries or death resulting from the
incident upon which the claim is based. The claimant shall
retain, as trustee for the department, so much of the
recovered funds as necessary to reimburse the Missouri crime
victims' compensation fund to the extent that compensation
was awarded to the claimant from that fund.
3. If a claimant initiates any legal proceeding to
recover restitution or damages related to the crime upon
which the claim is based, or if the claimant enters into
negotiations to receive any proceeds in settlement of a
claim for restitution or damages related to the crime, the
claimant shall give the department written notice within
fifteen days of the filing of the action or entering into
negotiations. The department may intervene in the
proceeding of a complainant to recover the compensation
awarded. If a claimant fails to give such written notice to
the department within the stated time period, or prior to
any attempt by claimant to reach a negotiated settlement of
claims for recovery of damages related to the crime upon
which the claim is based, the department's right of
subrogation to receive or recover funds from claimant, to
the extent that compensation was awarded by the department,
shall not be reduced in any amount or percentage by the
costs incurred by claimant attributable to such legal
proceedings or settlement, including, but not limited to,

SB 1772 33
attorney's fees, investigative cost or cost of court. If
such notice is given, [attorney] attorney's fees may be
awarded in an amount not to exceed [fifteen] ten percent of
the amount subrogated to the department.
4. Whenever compensation is awarded to a claimant who
is entitled to restitution from a criminal defendant, the
department may initiate restitution hearings in such
criminal proceedings or intervene in the same. The
department shall be entitled to receive restitution in such
proceedings to the extent compensation was awarded;
provided, however, the department shall be exempt from the
payment of any fees or other charges for the recording of
restitution orders in the offices of the judges of probate.
The claimant shall notify this department when restitution
is ordered. Failure to notify the department will result in
possible forfeiture of any amount already received from the
department.
5. Whenever the department shall deem it necessary to
protect, maintain or enforce the department's right to
subrogation or to exercise any of its powers or to carry out
any of its duties or responsibilities, the attorney general
may initiate legal proceedings or intervene in legal
proceedings as the department's legal representative.
595.045. 1. There is established in the state
treasury the "Crime Victims' Compensation Fund". A
surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed
as costs in each court proceeding filed in any court in the
state in all criminal cases including violations of any
county ordinance or any violation of criminal or traffic
laws of the state, including an infraction and violation of
a municipal ordinance; except that no such fee shall be
collected in any proceeding in any court when the proceeding

SB 1772 34
or the defendant has been dismissed by the court or when
costs are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality.
A surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be
assessed as costs in a juvenile court proceeding in which a
child is found by the court to come within the applicable
provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the moneys collected by clerks of the courts
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall be collected and disbursed in accordance with sections
488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable to the director of
the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the
amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state
forensic laboratory account administered by the department
of public safety to provide financial assistance to defray
expenses of crime laboratories if such analytical
laboratories are registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Agency or the Missouri department of health and
senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public
safety to the crime laboratories serving the courts of this
state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis
of blood, breath or urine in relation to a court proceeding.
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of
this section shall be denoted to the payment of an annual
appropriation for the administrative and operational costs
of the office for victims of crime and, if a statewide
automated crime victim notification system is established
pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of
expenditures actually incurred in the operation of such

SB 1772 35
system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) [Beginning on September 1, 2004, and] On the first
of each month, the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee
shall at least monthly report the moneys paid pursuant to
this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and
the services to victims fund to the department of public
safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be collected
and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020.
Five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city
treasury of the city from which such funds were collected.
The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be
payable to the director of revenue. The funds received by
the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable

SB 1772 36
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) [Beginning on September 1, 2004, and] On the first
of each month the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by
the Missouri state auditor. Such audit shall include all
records associated with crime victims' compensation funds
collected, held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section, the court shall enter a
judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the
crime victims' compensation fund, of sixty-eight dollars
upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for a class A or
B felony; forty-six dollars upon a plea of guilty or finding
of guilt for a class C, D, or E felony; and ten dollars upon
a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for any misdemeanor
under Missouri law except for those in chapter 252 relating
to fish and game, chapter 302 relating to drivers' and
commercial drivers' license, chapter 303 relating to motor
vehicle financial responsibility, chapter 304 relating to
traffic regulations, chapter 306 relating to watercraft
regulation and licensing, and chapter 307 relating to
100 vehicle equipment regulations. Any clerk of the court
101 receiving moneys pursuant to such judgments shall collect
102 and disburse such crime victims' compensation judgments in
103 the manner provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Such
104 funds shall be payable to the state treasury and deposited
105 to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund.

SB 1772 37
106 9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall
107 maintain records of all dispositions described in subsection
108 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment has
109 been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of
110 Missouri in accordance with this section; all payments made
111 on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
112 judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not
113 collected. These records shall be subject to audit by the
114 state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such
115 funds shall report separately the amount of dollars
116 collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
117 offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections
118 or services to victims collections.
119 10. The department of revenue shall maintain records
120 of funds transmitted to the crime victims' compensation fund
121 by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
122 subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate
123 records of collection for alcohol-related offenses.
124 11. The state courts administrator shall include in
125 the annual report required by section 476.350 the circuit
126 court caseloads and the number of crime victims'
127 compensation judgments entered.
128 12. All awards made to eligible injured victims under
129 sections 595.010 to 595.105 and all appropriations for
130 administration of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except
131 sections 595.050 and 595.055, shall be made from the crime
132 victims' compensation fund. Any unexpended balance
133 remaining in the crime victims' compensation fund at the end
134 of each biennium shall not be subject to the provision of
135 section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended
136 balance to the ordinary revenue fund of the state, but shall
137 remain in the crime victims' compensation fund. In the

SB 1772 38
138 event that there are insufficient funds in the crime
139 victims' compensation fund to pay all claims in full, all
140 claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis. If there are no
141 funds in the crime victims' compensation fund, then no claim
142 shall be paid until funds have again accumulated in the
143 crime victims' compensation fund. When sufficient funds
144 become available from the fund, awards which have not been
145 paid shall be paid in chronological order with the oldest
146 paid first. In the event an award was to be paid in
147 installments and some remaining installments have not been
148 paid due to a lack of funds, then when funds do become
149 available that award shall be paid in full. All such awards
150 on which installments remain due shall be paid in full in
151 chronological order before any other postdated award shall
152 be paid. Any award pursuant to this subsection is
153 specifically not a claim against the state, if it cannot be
154 paid due to a lack of funds in the crime victims'
155 compensation fund.
156 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as
157 provided in this section and such sum, or any part thereof,
158 remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any
159 disbursement, payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or
160 other transfer of money from the state of Missouri to such
161 defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such
162 judgment. Such amount shall be paid forthwith to the crime
163 victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such judgment
164 shall be entered on the court record. Under no
165 circumstances shall the general revenue fund be used to
166 reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The
167 director of the department of corrections shall have the
168 authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation fund
169 from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed

SB 1772 39
170 by the offender to the crime victims' compensation fund,
171 provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount owed
172 to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the
173 department of corrections.
174 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds
175 in the crime victims' compensation fund shall be paid into
176 the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
177 general revenue of this state.
178 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim
179 or false statement in connection with any claim hereunder is
180 guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
181 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions
182 for the benefit of crime victims. Such gifts and
183 contributions shall be credited to the crime victims'
184 compensation fund as used solely for compensating victims
185 under the provisions of sections 595.010 to 595.075.
186 17. The department of public safety shall verify
187 compliance with the eligibility requirements of any claimant
188 purporting to be an eligible injured victim under this
189 section prior to authorizing payment from the crime victims'
190 compensation fund, and shall deny any claim that fails to
191 meet such requirements.
✓